Hawaii statutes.
[§103F-407] Amendment and
cancellation of requests. A request may be amended or canceled, or any or
all proposals may be rejected in whole or in part, as specified in the request
or in accordance with rules adopted by the policy board, when it is in the best
interest of the state agency which issued the request to amend or cancel the
request, or reject proposals in whole or in part. The reason for amending or
canceling a request, or for rejecting proposals in whole or in part shall be
set out in writing and included in the contract file, and made available to the
public. [L 1997, c 190, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next